Maryland, session 2025, SB0047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
13–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Physical therapist assistant” means an individual LICENSED BY THE STATE
BOARD OF PHYSICAL THERAPY EXAMINERS who practices limited physical therapy and
who has passed the national physical therapy licensing examination administered or
accepted by the Board.
13–202.
(a) (1) The Board consists of [8] 9 members.
(2) Of the [8] 9 Board members:
– 1 –

Ch. 353 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Five shall be licensed physical therapists, of which a minimum
of four shall be engaged primarily in the clinical practice of physical therapy in this State;
(ii) [One] TWO shall be [a] licensed physical therapist [assistant]
ASSISTANTS practicing limited physical therapy in this State; and
(iii) Two shall be consumer members.
(3) The Governor shall appoint the licensed physical therapist members
and the licensed physical therapist assistant [member] MEMBERS, with the advice of the
Secretary, from a list of names of qualified individuals submitted to the Secretary and the
Governor by the American Physical Therapy Association of Maryland. The number of
names on the list shall be at least three times the number of vacancies.
(c) [The] EACH licensed physical therapist assistant member shall:
(1) Have 5 years’ experience in limited physical therapy; and
(2) Be engaged in the profession of limited physical therapy in this State.
13–311.
(a) (1) A license expires on the date set by the Board, unless the license is
renewed for an additional term as provided in this section.
(2) A license may not be renewed for a term longer than 2 years.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, at least 1 month
before the license expires, the Board shall send to the licensee, by [first–class mail]
ELECTRONIC MEANS to the last known E–MAIL address of the licensee, a renewal notice
that states:
(i) The date on which the current license expires;
(ii) The date by which the renewal application must be received by
the Board for the renewal to be issued [and mailed] before the license expires; and
(iii) The amount of the renewal fee.
(2) If requested by a licensee, the Board shall send to the licensee[, at least
two times within the month before a license expires,] a renewal notice by [electronic means]
FIRST–CLASS MAIL to the last known [electronic mail] address of the licensee.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 353
(3) If a renewal notice sent by electronic means under paragraph [(2)] (1)
of this subsection is returned to the Board as undeliverable, the Board shall send to the
licensee a renewal notice by first–class mail to the last known address of the licensee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –